Arkansas, session 2025, HB1243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-208(a), concerning reports of
contributions for candidates for school district, township, or municipal
office and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) Reports required. Except as provided in subsection (d) of this
section, each candidate for school district, township, or municipal office,
or a person acting in the candidate's behalf, shall file with the Secretary
of State in an election year for the office that the candidate is seeking:
(1)(A) For each year in which a candidate is not listed on a
ballot for election, file an annual report of all contributions received and
*SSS033*
04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H3/18/25 S4/7/25 HB1243
expenditures made during that year.
(B) The annual report shall be filed no later than fifteen
(15) days after the end of the year;
(2) No later than seven (7) days prior to any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, school election, or
special election in which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, file a
preelection report of all contributions received and expenditures made
between the period covered by the previous report, if any, and the period ten
(10) days before the election. In case of a runoff election, the report shall
cover all contributions received and expenditures made during that period of
time that begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose
and ends ten (10) days before the runoff election;
(3) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in
which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, school election, or
special election, or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular
office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall
appear on a ballot, file a final report of all contributions received and
expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required
to be filed. A final report is required regardless of whether a candidate has
received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars
($500);
(4) File supplemental reports of all contributions received and
expenditures made after the date of preparation of the final report. The
supplemental reports shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the receipt
of a contribution or the making of an expenditure;
(5)(A) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month
in which the candidate has withdrawn, file a final report of all
contributions received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on
reports previously required to be filed.
(B) If a candidate withdraws from the campaign, the
candidate shall notify the county clerk in writing of the withdrawal; and
(6) If a candidate keeps remaining campaign funds after an
election, the candidate shall continue filing the reports required by this
subsection (A)(i) A monthly report of all contributions received and
expenditures made during each month beginning with the month of January of a
04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H3/18/25 S4/7/25 HB1243
calendar year in which a candidate may be listed on a ballot for election.
(ii) A monthly report shall not be due under this
subdivision (a)(1)(A) for a month in which certain days of that month are
included in a preelection report required under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this
section or a final report required under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this
section.
(iii) In the case of a primary or runoff election,
those days of the month occurring after the date of the election shall be
carried forward and included in the next monthly report required under this
subdivision (a)(1)(A).
(iv) The monthly report shall be filed no later than
twenty (20) days after the end of each month, except that the final report
shall be filed as required in subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) of this section;
(B)(i) No later than seven (7) days before a preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, school election, or
special election in which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, a
preelection report of all contributions received and expenditures made
between the period covered by the previous report and the period ten (10)
days before the election.
(ii) In case of a runoff election, the preelection
report required under this subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall cover all
contributions received and expenditures made during that period of time that
begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose and ends
ten (10) days before the runoff election;
(C)(i) A final report of all contributions received and
expenditures made for that election that have not been disclosed on reports
previously required to be filed no later than twenty (20) days after the end
of the month following the month in which the candidate's name has appeared
on the ballot in a primary election, runoff election, general election,
school election, or special election or when only one (1) candidate qualifies
for a particular office or position and no position or name of an unopposed
candidate shall appear on a ballot.
(ii) A final report is required under this
subdivision (a)(1)(C) whether or not a candidate has received contributions
or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500); and
(D)(i) A final report of all contributions received and
04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H3/18/25 S4/7/25 HB1243
expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required
to be filed.
(ii) The final report under this subdivision
(a)(1)(D) shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the end of the
month in which the candidate has withdrawn.
(iii) If a candidate withdraws from the campaign,
the candidate shall notify the Secretary of State in writing of the
withdrawal.
(2)(A) A candidate shall not be required to file a fourth
quarter report under this subsection if the candidate keeps remaining
campaign funds after an election but does not have any activity before the
end of the year.
(B) A candidate shall continue filing the reports required
by this subsection if the candidate keeps remaining campaign funds and raises
campaign funds for a future campaign or expends campaign funds for office
holder expenses or a future election.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, in a
year for which there is no election for the office that the candidate is
seeking, each candidate for school district, township, or municipal office,
or a person acting in the candidate's behalf, shall file with the Secretary
of State no later than December 31 an annual report of all contributions
received and expenditures made for the year.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-208(d), concerning reports of
contributions not required for candidates for school district, township, or
municipal office and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to
read as follows:
(d) Reports Not Required.
(1) A candidate who has not received contributions or made
expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall not be required
to file any preelection reports required under subdivision (a)(1) subsection
(a) of this section.
(2) A candidate who has received contributions or made
expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) but not exceeding five
thousand dollars ($5,000) shall only file:
(A) A preelection report required under subdivision
04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H3/18/25 S4/7/25 HB1243
(a)(1)(B) of this section; and
(B) A final report required under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of
this section.
(3) In calculating the amount of contributions received or
expenditures made for purposes of this exception, the payment of the filing
fee from the candidate's personal funds shall not be considered as either a
contribution or an expenditure.
(2)(4) The preelection reports referenced in subdivision (a)(1)
subsection (a) of this section are required only for candidates with
opponents in those elections.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-6-209(a), concerning reports of
contributions for candidates for county office and resulting from Initiated
Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Reports Required. Except as provided in subsection (d) of this
section, each candidate for county office or a person acting in the
candidate's behalf shall file with the Secretary of State in an election year
for the office that the candidate is seeking:
(1)(A) For each year in which a candidate is not listed on a
ballot for election, file an annual report of all contributions received and
expenditures made during that year.
(B) The annual report shall be filed no later than fifteen
(15) days after the end of the year;
(2) No later than seven (7) days prior to any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election in
which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, file a preelection report
of all contributions received and expenditures made between the period
covered by the previous report, if any, and the period ten (10) days before
the election. In case of a runoff election, the report shall cover all
contributions received and expenditures made during that period of time that
begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose and ends
ten (10) days before the runoff election;
(3) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in
which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election, or
when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and
04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H3/18/25 S4/7/25 HB1243
no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot, file
a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made that have
not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed. A final report
is required regardless of whether a candidate has received contributions or
made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500);
(4) File supplemental reports of all contributions received and
expenditures made after the date of preparation of the final report, and the
supplemental reports shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the receipt
of a contribution or the making of an expenditure;
(5)(A) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month
in which the candidate has withdrawn, a final report of all contributions
received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports
previously required to be filed.
(B) If a candidate withdraws from the campaign, the
candidate shall notify the county clerk in writing of the withdrawal; and
(6) If a candidate keeps remaining campaign funds after an
election, the candidate shall continue filing the reports required by this
subsection (A)(i) A monthly report of all contributions received and
expenditures made during each month beginning with the month of January of a
calendar year in which a candidate may be listed on a ballot for election.
(ii) A monthly report shall not be due under this
subdivision (a)(1)(A) for a month in which certain days of that month are
included in a preelection report required under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this
section or a final report required under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this
section.
(iii) In the case of a primary or runoff election,
those days of the month occurring after the date of the election shall be
carried forward and included in the next monthly report required under this
subdivision (a)(1)(A).
(iv) The monthly report shall be filed no later than
twenty (20) days after the end of each month, except that the final report
shall be filed as required in subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) of this section;
campaign contributions or expenditures exceed five hundred dollars ($500);
(B)(i) No later than seven (7) days before a preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election in
which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, a preelection report of all
04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H3/18/25 S4/7/25 HB1243
contributions received and expenditures made between the period covered by
the previous report and the period ten (10) days before the election.
(ii) In case of a runoff election, the preelection
report required under this subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall cover all
contributions received and expenditures made during that period of time that
begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose and ends
ten (10) days before the runoff election;
(C)(i) A final report of all contributions received and
expenditures made for that election that have not been disclosed on reports
previously required to be filed no later than twenty (20) days after the end
of the month following the month in which the candidate's name has appeared
on the ballot in a primary election, runoff election, general election, or
special election or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular
office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall
appear on a ballot.
(ii) A final report is required under this
subdivision (a)(1)(C) whether or not a candidate has received contributions
or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500); and
(D)(i) A final report of all contributions received and
expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required
to be filed.
(ii) The final report under this subdivision
(a)(1)(D) shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the end of the
month in which the candidate has withdrawn.
(iii) If a candidate withdraws from the campaign,
the candidate shall notify the Secretary of State in writing of the
withdrawal.
(2)(A) A candidate shall not be required to file a fourth
quarter report under this subsection if the candidate keeps remaining
campaign funds after an election but does not have any activity before the
end of the year.
(B) A candidate shall continue filing the reports required
by this subsection if the candidate keeps remaining campaign funds and raises
campaign funds for a future campaign or expends campaign funds for office
holder expenses or a future election.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, in a
04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H3/18/25 S4/7/25 HB1243
year for which there is no election for the office that the candidate is
seeking, each candidate for county office, or a person acting in the
candidate's behalf, shall file with the Secretary of State not later than
December 31 an annual report of all contributions received and expenditures
made for the year.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-6-209(d), concerning reports of
contributions not required for candidates for county office and resulting
from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Reports Not Required.
(1) A candidate who has not received contributions or made
expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall not be required
to file any preelection reports required under subdivision (a)(1) subsection
(a) of this section.
(2) A candidate who has received contributions or made
expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) but not exceeding five
thousand dollars ($5,000) shall only file:
(A) A preelection report required under subdivision
(a)(1)(B) of this section; and
(B) A final report required under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of
this section.
(3) In calculating the amount of contributions received or
expenditures made for purposes of this exception, the payment of the filing
fee from the candidate's personal funds shall not be considered as either a
contribution or an expenditure.
(2)(4) The preelection reports referenced in subdivision (a)(1)
subsection (a) of this section are required only for candidates with
opponents in those elections.
/s/Underwood







04-07-2025 18:57:06 SSS033